Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) By December 1, 2027, the joint legislative audit and review committee must conduct a study analyzing the financial oversight of the interstate bridge replacement project. The analysis must include the following components:(a) Financial transparency and reporting by:(i) Assessing whether project financial reporting complies with state and federal reporting requirements;(ii) Comparing the project's financial disclosures against benchmarks from similar megaprojects to determine best practices in cost reporting and public accessibility;(b) Expenditure review and accountability, which includes, but is not limited to:(i) Analyzing how funding has been allocated and spent since the project restart in 2019, comparing actual expenditures against initial funding plans and subsequent legislative approvals;(ii) Identifying major cost overruns and reviewing supporting explanations;(iii) Reviewing the sample of payments to non-Washington agencies;(iv) Reviewing processes to address potential conflicts of interest;(c) Forecasting, data use, and decision making by:(i) Assessing the reliability of traffic, ridership, and potential toll revenue projections;(ii) Reviewing forecasting process against industry best practices and similar projects;(iii) Evaluating the consideration of alternative transportation options, such as bus rapid transit, in the forecasting process;(d) Oversight and internal controls, including:(i) Reviewing the Washington state department of transportation's financial oversight and auditing mechanisms for the project, comparing them to best practices in financial accountability and risk management;(ii) Examining prior audit findings related to the project and determining whether corrective actions were implemented.(2) The joint legislative audit and review committee may contract for expertise in transportation infrastructure, financial management, or project auditing and shall submit a final report on its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2027.(3) This section expires December 31, 2027.--- END ---